Maryland, session 2026, HB0139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
11–247.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0139*

HOUSE BILL 139
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, BEGINNING
BEGINNING IN CALENDAR YEAR 2026, NOVEMBER 11 SHALL BE A TAX–FREE DAY IN
MARYLAND DURING WHICH THE SALES AND USE TAX DOES NOT APPLY TO A SALE TO
A VETERAN IF THE TAXABLE PRICE OF THE ITEM FOR SALE IS LESS THAN $2,000
$250.
(B) THE COMPTROLLER, IN THE COMPTROLLER’S SOLE DISCRETION, MAY
SUSPEND THE TAX–FREE DAY ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION.
(C) TO QUALIFY FOR THE EXEMPTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, AN INDIVIDUAL:
(1) SHALL PROVIDE TO THE VENDOR EVIDENCE OF ELIGIBILITY FOR
THE EXEMPTION; AND
(2) MAY ESTABLISH THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS A VETERAN BY
PRODUCING A VALID DRIVER’S LICENSE OR, GOVERNMENT–ISSUED IDENTIFICATION
CARD OR LICENSE THAT INCLUDES A NOTATION INDICATING THAT THE INDIVIDUAL
IS A VETERAN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.